West Virginia, session 2026, SB964.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1B. safe library books for kids committee. §10-1B-1. Committee establishment; responsibilities; scope; and penalties. (a) Committee appointment; terms; and meetings. – There is hereby created the Governor's safe library books for kids committee within the Department of Tourism. The secretary of the Department of Tourism or his or her designated representative shall be ex officio members of the committee. In addition, The Governor shall appoint four additional members of the committee. The appointive members of the committee shall serve for a term of two years. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation.  The Governor shall designate from the committee a chairman to serve for a term of one year. The committee shall meet upon the call of the chairman annually and shall meet at such other times as may be necessary for the performance of its functions.(b) Responsibilities. – The committee shall be charged with the following responsibilities:(1) To review and create a rating system based upon age appropriateness for all books in the children's to teens reading sections of any public library; and(2) To review all titles currently held in West Virginia public libraries starting with books for the youngest readers first and working up to teen and then adult level books.(c) Scope. – All books designated a rating based upon age appropriateness shall be placed in the appropriate section of the library.  Adult level books shall not be rated, and any book that is a non-rated book shall not be placed in the children's or teens' sections after the rating occurs. (d) Penalties. – Whoever violates the provisions of subsection (c) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined a minimum of $500 per occurrence.